Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7991.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings.
The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) Nature-based solutions, including living shorelines, wetland restoration, floodplain
reconnection, and green infrastructure, have been demonstrated to be proven, mature, and effective
strategies for managing erosion, flooding, and other water resource challenges.
(2) The Rhode Island Coastal Resources Management Council (CRMC) incorporates living
shoreline principles in its regulatory programs, prioritizing natural erosion control methods that
protect coastal ecosystems.
(3) The Ocean State Climate Adaptation and Resilience Fund supports projects that utilize
nature-based solutions to enhance community and environmental resilience.
(4) Efficient, coordinated, and timely permitting is critical to advancing nature-based
projects that address climate adaptation and resilience goals.
SECTION 2. Title 46 of the General Laws entitled "WATERS AND NAVIGATION" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 23.5
COASTAL RESILIENCE – NATURE-BASED SOLUTIONS FOR EROSION CONTROL,
WATER RESOURCE MANAGEMENT, AND EXPEDITED PERMITTING
46-23.5-1. State policy on nature-based solutions for coastal resilience.

(a) It is hereby declared to be the policy of the state to encourage and prioritize the use of
nature-based solutions as a preferred means of enhancing climate resilience, mitigating natural
hazards, and protecting public health, safety, and welfare.
(b) Covered municipalities and relevant state agencies shall, to the maximum extent
practicable and consistent with existing law, consider nature-based solutions as preferred
alternatives to solely structural or hard-engineered approaches when reviewing, approving, or
funding projects subject to their jurisdiction.
46-23.5-2. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter:
(1) "Director" means the director of the department of environmental management (DEM).
(2) "Nature-based solution" means a project that uses, restores, or mimics natural processes
to manage erosion, flooding, or water quality including, but not limited to, living shorelines, marsh
restoration, floodplain reconnection, urban green infrastructure, dune restoration, and riparian
buffers.
(3) "Qualifying project" means a nature-based solution certified by the director of the
department of environment management, or designee, to meet criteria for ecological benefit,
resilience enhancement, and alignment with state climate goals.
46-23.5-3. Integration with existing programs.
(a) Effective January 1, 2027, the department of environmental management (DEM) and
the coastal resources management council (CRMC) in consultation with the chief resilience officer
(CRO) designated pursuant to § 46-23.4-2, shall update its rules, regulations and permitting criteria
to prioritize nature-based solutions and incorporate expedited review procedures for qualifying
projects submitted pursuant to this chapter.
(b) The DEM, CRMC and any other relevant state agencies shall align their permitting and
funding programs to support the expedited permitting process pursuant to this chapter.
(c) The ocean state climate adaptation and resilience fund shall, from funds appropriated
pursuant to this chapter, allocate resources for project support, technical assistance, and monitoring
of funded nature-based solutions approved pursuant to this chapter.
46-23.5-4. Coordination.
(a) The DEM in consultation with the CRMC and the office of the chief resilience officer
(CRO) shall serve as the central coordinating entity for expedited permitting of qualifying projects
and shall:
(1) Accept applications for expedited review status;
(2) Coordinate review among involved municipal governments and state agencies
LC003490 - Page 2 of 4

including, but not limited to, the CRMC, DEM, and department of health;
(3) Facilitate pre-application consultation to identify and resolve potential permitting
issues; and
(4) Track and report annually on expedited permitting activities to the governor and general
assembly.
(b) Municipal and agency review deadlines for qualifying projects under this chapter.
(1) Municipalities to the extent applicable and any relevant state agencies shall provide an
initial completeness determination or list of substantive deficiencies for qualifying projects within
thirty (30) calendar days of receiving an application pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Municipalities to the extent applicable and any relevant agencies shall complete their
permit decision (approval, conditional approval, or denial) within ninety (90) calendar days of
receipt of a complete application.
(3) Municipalities and agencies shall work collaboratively to avoid duplicative review
processes and coordinate public comment periods when practicable.
(c) Regulations and guidance. Municipalities and agencies involved in the permitting
process for projects under this chapter shall adopt necessary regulations or guidance to implement
this expedited permitting process by January 1, 2027.
46-23.5-5. Rules and regulations.
The director shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this
chapter.
46-23.5-6. Reporting.
Effective January 1, 2027, the director shall submit an annual report by March 1, to the
governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and president of the senate detailing all
applications received and expedited permits issued, all project outcomes and ecological benefits,
and any recommendations for statutory or regulatory improvements.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003490
========
LC003490 - Page 3 of 4